Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1306
Cooperative; use of word restricted; penalty for violation.

No corporation, company, firm or association which shall not be incorporated as a cooperative corporation shall adopt or use the words cooperative or any abbreviation thereof as a part of its name. Any person or company violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for each day's continuance of the offense.

Laws 1921, c. 28, § 5, p. 162;

C.S.1922, § 646;

C.S.1929, § 24-1305;

R.S.1943, § 21-1306;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 78.